District of Columbia statutes.
31-5413

Tax exemptions.

The Association shall be exempt from payment of all fees and all taxes levied by the District of Columbia.

History

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-129, § 14, 39 DCR 4036

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1953.